Kentucky statutes. TITLE II Legislative Branch
Conduct of Legislators

6.731.
General standards of conduct — Penalties.

A legislator, by himself or through others, shall not intentionally:

Use or attempt to use his influence as a member of the General Assembly in any matter which involves a substantial conflict between his personal interest and his duties in the public interest. Violation of this subsection is a Class A misdemeanor;

Use his official position or office to obtain financial gain for himself, any members of the legislator’s family, or a business associate of the legislator. Violation of this subsection is a Class D felony;

Use or attempt to use his official position to secure or create privileges, exemptions, advantages, or treatment for himself or others in direct contravention of the public interest at large. Violation of this subsection is a Class A misdemeanor;

Use public funds, time, or personnel for his private gain or that of another, unless the use is authorized by law. Violation of this subsection is a Class A misdemeanor;

Use public funds, time, or personnel for partisan political campaign activity, unless the use is:

Authorized by law; or

Properly incidental to another activity required or authorized by law, such as elections to constitutional or party offices within the General Assembly. Violation of this subsection is a Class A misdemeanor;

Use his official legislative stationery, or a facsimile thereof, to solicit a vote or a contribution for his or another person’s campaign for election or reelection to public office, or use the great seal of the Commonwealth on his campaign stationery or campaign literature. For purposes of this subsection, “official legislative stationery” means the stationery used by a legislator on a day-to-day basis for correspondence related to his duties as a member of the General Assembly. Violation of this subsection is ethical misconduct.

While in the discharge of the duties of his office, become intoxicated by the use of spiritous, vinous, or malt liquors, or any controlled substance, as defined in KRS

218A.010

. Any legislator who is unable, incompetent, or disqualified to discharge any of the duties of his office because of the use of spiritous, vinous, or malt liquors, or any controlled substance, as defined in KRS

218A.010

, shall be deemed to have violated this subsection. Violation of this subsection is ethical misconduct.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 262, § 6; 1988, ch. 420, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 6, effective September 16, 1993.

6.734.
Prohibition against disclosure or use of confidential information — Penalty.

A legislator shall not intentionally disclose or use confidential information acquired in the course of his official duties, if the primary purpose of the disclosure is to further his own economic interest or that of another person. Information shall be deemed confidential if it is not subject to public disclosure pursuant to the Kentucky Open Records Act, KRS

61.872

to

61.884

, at the time of its disclosure or use. Violation of this section is a Class D felony.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 7, effective September 16, 1993.

6.737.
Prohibition against certain contracts with state agency — Penalty.

A legislator or candidate by himself, or through others, shall not intentionally undertake, execute, hold, or enjoy, in whole or in part, any contract, agreement, sale, or purchase of the value of one hundred dollars ($100) or more per transaction, made, entered into, awarded, or granted by any state agency, except:

Contracts, agreements, sales, or purchases between a state agency and a business in which the legislator and his spouse, collectively, own or control an interest of five percent (5%) or less;

Contracts, agreements, sales, or purchases made or let after public notice and competitive bidding;

Contracts, agreements, sales, or purchases which are available on similar terms to members of the legislator’s business, occupation, or profession; or

Contracts or agreements entered into prior to the time the legislator became a candidate.

Violation of this section is a Class D felony, and the court upon conviction may void the contract, agreement, sale, or purchase violating this provision.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 8, effective September 16, 1993.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Designation of offenses; penalties, see KRS

532.020

.

6.741.
Prohibition against certain leases or sales of real property with state agency — Penalty.

A legislator, his spouse, or any business in which he or his spouse own or control an interest of more than five percent (5%) shall not intentionally lease or sell any facility, building, or other real property to a state agency while the legislator is a member of the General Assembly. This provision shall not apply to sales or leases made under threat of or pursuant to KRS Chapter 416, relating to eminent domain, and does not impair any lawful contract existing on September 16, 1993. This section shall not apply to a lease or sale for a nominal consideration if the lease or sale is preapproved by the commission. Violation of this section is a Class D felony, and the court upon conviction may void any sale or lease violating this provision.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 9, effective September 16, 1993.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Designation of offenses; penalties, see KRS

532.020

.

6.744.
Prohibitions against influencing state agency and appearing as a paid expert witness before state agency — Restriction of representation of clients before state agency or in court — Penalties.

A legislator, by himself or through others, shall not use or attempt to use any means to influence a state agency in direct contravention of the public interest at large.

Absent an express threat of legislative reprisal, nothing in this subsection shall prevent a legislator from contacting a state agency on behalf of a person or constituent, to make a legislative inquiry, or to obtain information relating to a person or constituent who has requested legislative assistance and given written or verbal consent for a member to make an inquiry on his or her behalf.

Violation of this subsection is ethical misconduct.

A legislator shall not, for compensation, appear before a state agency as an expert witness. A violation of this subsection is ethical misconduct.

A legislator who is properly licensed may, for compensation, represent a client before a state agency in:

A ministerial function which does not require discretion on the part of the agency, including, but not limited to:

Filing corporation charters, reports, and other papers;

Filing tax returns;

Filing reports required by a state agency;

Filing an application to participate in a state or state-administered federal program, generally available to similar classes of persons or business entities.

An adversarial proceeding and negotiations related thereto;

Workers’ compensation and special fund proceedings;

Unemployment compensation proceedings; and

All other matters, unless the representation is prohibited by subsections (5) to (7) of this section or the code of professional conduct observed by the profession being practiced.

A legislator who is properly licensed may, for compensation, represent a client before a court or trial commissioner in any proceeding not prohibited by the Kentucky Rules of Professional Conduct or by subsections (5) to (7) of this section.

Other than for a ministerial function provided for under subsection (3) of this section, even though properly licensed, a legislator may not, for compensation, represent or engage in negotiations on behalf of a client before or with a state agency in proceedings related to the following matters:

Contracting for the purchase, sale, rental, or lease of real property, goods, or services from a state agency;

Any proceeding relating to ratemaking;

Adoption, amendment, or repeal of any administrative regulation;

Obtaining grants of money or loans;

Licensing or permitting, but not including matters related to driver licensing; or

Any proceeding before the Public Service Commission.

A legislator who is licensed in any profession shall not, for compensation, represent the Commonwealth or any state agency.

A legislator who is an attorney shall not for compensation maintain an action for the purpose of receiving money damages against the Commonwealth in which the Commonwealth is the principal defendant or against a state agency in which the agency is the principal defendant. This subsection shall not apply to:

An appeal of an action by the state against the client;

Cases before the Workers’ Compensation Board, including cases in which the special fund is a party; and

Unemployment compensation cases.

A legislator who is properly licensed who has a partner who is also properly licensed and whose partner practices cases which the legislator is precluded from handling under the provisions of this section shall report to the commission in the report required under KRS

6.787

, the names of the agencies before which the partners practiced and the names of the clients represented by the partners.

A legislator shall not receive or enter into any express or implied agreement to receive compensation for services to be rendered in relation to any case, proceeding, application, or other matter before any state agency, in which his compensation is to be dependent or contingent upon any action by the agency. Violation of this subsection is ethical misconduct.

If a legislator considers entering into an agreement for compensation for representing any person in any transaction involving the state, he shall consider the following factors:

Whether the matter is being brought to him in an attempt to obtain improper influence over the state agency;

Whether there is a reasonable possibility that the action of the state agency will be unduly influenced because of his participation; or

The effect of his participation on public confidence in the integrity of the Legislature.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 262, § 10; 1980, ch. 188, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 10, effective September 16, 1993; 1994, ch. 479, § 6, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 211, § 5, effective July 15, 1996.

6.747.
Prohibition against honoraria — Authorization for certain out-of-state travel — Penalty.

A legislator shall not accept any compensation in consideration for an appearance, speech, or article unless the appearance, speech, or article is both related to the legislator’s employment outside the General Assembly and is unrelated to his or her position as a legislator.

A legislator may accept prepaid transportation, food, and lodging or be reimbursed for actual expenses for out-of-state travel associated with the performance of his or her duties as a legislator if he or she obtains prior approval of the travel from a majority of the Legislative Research Commission. However, a legislative agent or employer shall not furnish or pay for out-of-state transportation or lodging for a legislator. A legislative agent or employer may furnish food, beverages, or local transportation for an event held in conjunction with a meeting of a multistate or national organization referenced in KRS 6.611(2)(b)11., if the event is conducted in accordance with KRS 6.611(2)(b)8.a. to d. The reimbursement of expenses pursuant to this subsection shall be reported to the Legislative Research Commission.

Violation of this section is ethical misconduct.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 11, effective September 16, 1993; 2014, ch. 75, § 4, effective July 15, 2014.

6.750.
Renumbered as KRS 6.611, effective September 16, 1993.

6.751.
Prohibition against acceptance of additional compensation or gifts for performance of legislative duties — Penalties.

A legislator shall not knowingly accept compensation, other than that provided by law for members of the General Assembly, for performance of his legislative duties. No person, other than state officials or employees performing their duties in making payments to members of the General Assembly as provided by law, may pay or offer to pay any person any compensation for performance of his legislative duties. Violation of this subsection is a Class A misdemeanor.

A legislator or his spouse shall not solicit, accept, or agree to accept anything of value from a legislative agent or an employer. Violation of this subsection is a Class B misdemeanor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 262, § 9; 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 12, effective September 16, 1993.

6.754.
Prohibition against employment of and certain other conduct relating to members of a legislator’s family — Exception — Penalty.

A member of a legislator’s family shall not be employed or appointed to an office or position in the legislative branch of state government.

A legislator shall not advocate or cause the employment, appointment, promotion, transfer, or advancement of a member of the legislator’s family to an office or position in the executive branch of state government.

A legislator shall not participate in any action relating to the disciplining of a member of the legislator’s family in the legislative or executive branch of state government.

Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to a member of a legislator’s family who is employed or appointed to an office or position in the legislative branch of state government prior to the legislator’s election to the General Assembly or prior to February 18, 1993.

Violation of this section is ethical misconduct.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 13, effective September 16, 1993.

6.755.
Principles of ethical behavior for legislators. [Repealed.]

6.757.
Restriction on former legislator becoming a legislative agent — Prohibition against legislator being a legislative agent — Penalty.

A former legislator shall not be a legislative agent, other than for a public agency, until after two (2) years have elapsed since the date the legislator left office.

A legislator shall not be a legislative agent.

Violation of this section is ethical misconduct.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 14, effective September 16, 1993.

6.760.
Conflict of interest — Disqualification from voting — Disclosure of interest. [Repealed.]

6.761.
Conflict of interest provisions — Penalty.

A legislator shall not intentionally participate in the discussion of a question in committee or on the floor of the General Assembly, vote, or make a decision in his official capacity on any matter:

In which he, or any member of his family, or the legislator’s business associate will derive a direct monetary gain or suffer a direct monetary loss as a result of his vote or decision; or

Which relates specifically to a business in which he owns or controls an interest of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more, or an interest of more than five percent (5%).

Violation of this provision is a Class D felony. The provisions of this subsection notwithstanding, a legislator may vote on legislation affecting his salary, expenses, benefits, and allowances, as provided by law. The provisions of this subsection notwithstanding, a legislator may participate in the discussion of the question in committee and on the floor of the General Assembly, vote, or make a decision on a matter if any benefit or detriment which accrues to the member of the General Assembly, as a member of a business, profession, occupation, or other group, or to a member of his family or a business interest specified in subsection (1)(b) of this section is of no greater extent than the benefit or detriment which accrues generally to other members of the business, profession, occupation, or other group;

A legislator who has a personal or private interest in a bill proposed or pending before the General Assembly shall be subject to the limitations of Section 57 of the Constitution of Kentucky, which provides that the legislator shall disclose his interest to the house of which he is a member and refrain from voting upon pain of expulsion. A member shall disclose his interest by filing a disclosure statement with the clerk or by a verbal announcement to the body.

The right of legislators to represent their constituencies, however, is of such major importance that legislators should be barred from voting on matters of direct personal interest only in clear cases and if the matter is particularly personal.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 15, effective September 16, 1993.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Designation of offenses; penalties, see KRS

532.020

.

Sentence of imprisonment for felony, see KRS

532.060

.

6.764.
Offices incompatible with being a legislator — Exception — Penalties.

A legislator shall not accept any appointment as an officer or employee of the Commonwealth or any state agency except as provided in subsection (3) of this section and in Section 165 of the Constitution unless he shall have first resigned his membership in the General Assembly, and it shall be unlawful for the State Treasurer to pay any salary by reason of the appointment until the resignation has been received by the presiding officer of the house of which he or she is a member. Violation of this subsection is ethical misconduct.

A legislator shall not accept any appointment or serve as a member of the governing body of any special purpose governmental entity as defined in KRS

65A.010

which has the statutory authority to levy taxes or to set rates unless he or she shall have first resigned his membership in the General Assembly. Violation of this provision is ethical misconduct.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, a legislator may serve on the faculty or staff of any of the state universities or community colleges or as an employee of a local public school board without resigning his or her membership in the General Assembly.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 262, § 11; 1978, ch. 16, § 1, effective February 24, 1978; 1979 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 2, effective February 10, 1979; 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 16, effective September 16, 1993; 2013, ch. 40, § 81, effective March 21, 2013.

6.765.
Personal or private interest defined — Exceptions. [Repealed.]

6.767.
Prohibitions against acceptance of campaign contributions from legislative agents at any time and from employers of legislative agents or permanent committees during regular sessions — Penalties — Defenses.

For purposes of this section, “accept” means the date a contribution is postmarked, if mailed, or the date of the hand delivery, if the contribution is hand-delivered.

A member of the General Assembly, candidate for the General Assembly, or his or her campaign committee shall not accept a campaign contribution from a legislative agent. Violation of this provision is ethical misconduct.

A member of the General Assembly, candidate for the General Assembly, or his or her campaign committee shall not, during a regular session of the General Assembly, accept a campaign contribution from an employer of a legislative agent, or from a permanent committee as defined in KRS

121.015

. Violation of this provision is ethical misconduct. This subsection shall not apply to:

Candidates for the General Assembly in a special election held during a regular session of the General Assembly; or

A member of the General Assembly who is a candidate, as defined in KRS

121.015

, contemporaneously seeking election for a statewide office.

It shall be a complete defense under this section if the legislator, candidate, or his or her campaign committee receives a campaign contribution from a legislative agent or, during a regular session, from an employer or from a permanent committee, which fact is unknown to the legislator, candidate, or committee at the time of receipt, if the legislator, candidate, or his or her campaign committee either returns the contribution within thirty (30) days of receipt, and within fourteen (14) additional days makes that fact, together with the name of the contributor, amount of the contribution, and the date of return or payment known, in writing to the commission. It shall also be a defense if a legislator, candidate, or his or her campaign committee receives a campaign contribution from a legislative agent whose name does not yet appear on the list of legislative agents and their employers furnished to the Legislative Research Commission if the legislator, candidate, or his or her campaign committee returns the campaign contribution within thirty (30) days of the Legislative Research Commission’s receipt of the list bearing the name of the legislative agent and all employers and makes the written disclosure to the commission required in this subsection. The time periods shall be tolled upon the filing with the commission of a request for an advisory opinion regarding the campaign contribution. Upon the issuance of the opinion or decision not to render an opinion, the time period shall resume.

History.

Enact. Acts 1993 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 17, effective September 16, 1993; 2014, ch. 75, § 5, effective July 15, 2014; 2017 ch. 122, § 7, effective June 29, 2017; 2022 ch. 208, § 4, effective April 14, 2022.

6.770.
Guidelines to determine necessity of abstention from voting due to conflict of interest. [Repealed.]

6.775.
Renumbered as KRS 6.731, effective September 16, 1993.

6.780.
Acceptance of economic opportunity prohibited. [Repealed.]